Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,273
Change of name; effect; costs; how taxed; exception.

(1) Unless the petitioner is allowed to proceed in forma pauperis in accordance with sections 25-2301 to 25-2310, all proceedings under sections 25-21,270 to 25-21,272 shall be at the cost of the petitioner, for which fee-bill or execution may issue as in civil cases.

(2) Any change of names under such sections shall not in any manner affect or alter any right of action, legal process, or property.

Laws 1871, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 5318;

C.S.1922, § 4611;

C.S.1929, § 61-104;

R.S.1943, § 61-104;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 61-104;

Laws 2023, LB157, § 4.